Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 9
SURVEYOR

30-10-901. Surveyor - election - bond - insurance.

A county surveyor shall be elected for a term of four years, shall be a professional land surveyor as provided in part 3 of article 120 of title 12, and, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, shall file an official bond in the office of the county clerk and recorder, to be approved by the board of county commissioners, in the sum of one thousand dollars, conditioned for the faithful discharge of duties.

In lieu of the bond required by subsection (1) of this section, a county may purchase crime insurance coverage in an amount not less than ten thousand dollars on behalf of the surveyor to protect the people of the county from any malfeasance on the part of the surveyor while in office.

Source:

G.L.

§ 543.

G.S.

§ 650.

R.S. 08:

§ 1345.

C.L.

§ 8822.

CSA:

C. 45, § 169.

CRS 53:

§ 35-9-1.

L. 56:

p. 130, § 6.

L. 63:

p. 265, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-9-1.

L. 69:

p. 224, § 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 1121, § 29, effective June 7.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 565, § 30, effective August 11.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1718, § 213, effective October 1.

30-10-902. Deputies - certificates admitted as evidence.

The county surveyor may appoint as many deputies as he thinks proper, for whose official acts he shall be responsible. The certificate of the county surveyor or any of his deputies shall be admitted as legal evidence in any court of the state, but the certificate may be explained or rebutted by other evidence.

Source:

G.L.

§ 544.

G.S.

§ 651.

R.S. 08:

§ 1346.

C.L.

§ 8823.

CSA:

C. 45, § 170.

CRS 53:

§ 35-9-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-9-2.

30-10-903. Duties and powers of the county surveyor.

The duties of the county surveyor are:

To represent the county in boundary disputes between adjoining counties pursuant to section 30-6-110, and in section or quarter corner disputes pursuant to section 30-10-906, and to locate lost, destroyed, or disputed corners and boundaries pursuant to section 38-44-104;

To notify the county attorney of any unsettled boundary disputes or boundary discrepancies within the county which may come to his attention;

To file in the office of the county surveyor, or in the office of the county clerk and recorder if there is no office for the county surveyor in the county, all surveys, field notes, calculations, maps, and any other records pertaining to work authorized and financed by the board of county commissioners. All surveys made by the county surveyor or his deputies shall be numbered consecutively by the county surveyor, and all field notes and calculations pertaining to such surveys shall be endorsed by the county surveyor with the number of the survey to which they pertain.

The county surveyor may, when authorized by the board of county commissioners, and when financially compensated by agreement between the surveyor and the board of county commissioners:

Conduct surveys to establish the boundaries of county property, including road rights-of-way, or any other surveys necessary to the county;

Accept for filing maps of surveys that establish monuments and keep a current record of all survey monuments within the county;

Examine all survey maps and plats before they are recorded by the county clerk and recorder to insure proper content and form;

Conduct geodetic control surveys, vertical control surveys, or any surveys for the purpose of geographic information systems;

Conduct or supervise construction surveys necessary to the county;

Provide reference monuments for or the remonumentation or monument upgrades of public land survey system monuments that are destroyed by county construction or other functions; and

Provide other services requiring the expertise of a professional land surveyor as agreed upon by the county surveyor and the county board of commissioners.

The county commissioners may elect to have any service specified in subsection (2) of this section contracted out to a qualified private professional surveyor or survey firm, or have another department in the county that employs Colorado licensed surveyors perform the work.

Source:

G.L.

§ 545.

G.S.

§ 652.

R.S. 08:

§ 1347.

C.L.

§ 8824.

CSA:

C. 45, § 171.

CRS 53:

§ 35-9-3.

L. 63:

p. 265, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-9-3.

L. 94:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1507, § 40, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2)(d), (2)(e), and (2)(f) added, p. 293, § 4, effective August 3.

L. 2017:

(1)(a), IP(2), (2)(e), and (2)(f) amended and (2)(g) and (3) added, (HB 17-1017), ch. 15, p. 43, § 1, effective August 9.

30-10-904. Vacancy - how filled.

If the office of county surveyor is at any time vacant, the board of county commissioners shall, within six months after the vacancy occurs, appoint some suitable and qualified person, who need not be a resident of the county, to fill the position of surveyor until the next general election.

Source:

G.L.

§ 547.

G.S.

§ 654.

R.S. 08:

§ 1349.

C.L.

§ 8826.

CSA:

C. 45, § 173.

CRS 53:

§ 35-9-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-9-4.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 77, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1017), ch. 15, p. 44, § 2, effective August 9.

30-10-905. Remuneration - expenses.

In counties of every class, the board of county commissioners may provide for additional compensation by agreement between the county surveyor and the board of county commissioners to be paid to the county surveyor who performs services for the county in addition to the duties specified in section 30-10-903, which compensation shall be paid out of the county treasury.

The board of county commissioners may authorize any material and equipment necessary for the performance of any of the duties of the county surveyor; but, the material and equipment so provided shall not be used for any purpose other than to perform the duties of the county surveyor.

A county surveyor and any of his deputies may engage in private survey practice, if such private practice does not interfere with the performance of their official duties.

Except as provided in section 30-10-906, no county surveyor nor any of his deputies shall accept any remuneration other than that provided by the board of county commissioners for the performance of any act required as part of his official duties.

While engaged in an act necessary to the performance of his official duties, no county surveyor nor any of his deputies shall perform any act not directly related to his official duties.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 266, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-9-5.

L. 78:

(4) amended, p. 272, § 92, effective May 23.

L. 94:

(4) amended, p. 1508, § 41, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 449, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (SB 10-182), ch. 291, p. 1352, § 2, effective May 26.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (HB 17-1017), ch. 15, p. 44, § 3, effective August 9.

30-10-906. Disputed boundaries - notice - establishment of legal corner monument.

Whenever the proper location of any section corner or quarter section corner is in dispute, a corner monument shall be established by the county surveyor for the county in which such corner is located pursuant to this section.

Upon receipt of an application from any party in interest and the fee required pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and subsequent to giving notice as required pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the county surveyor shall gather evidence and conduct any necessary surveys to establish the location of a monument.

Within two weeks of receipt of an application and fee pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the county surveyor shall give notice including the date when such surveyor will be in the vicinity of the disputed corner in the following manner:

For parties whose property rights might be affected by the establishment of the location of a monument, by written notice;

For parties to whom written notice cannot be given because of an incorrect address or because there are more than fifty known affected landowners, by publishing for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the applicable county or, if there is no newspaper published in such county, in some newspaper of general circulation published in the nearest county;

For all professional land surveyors who have filed a monument record on the disputed corner or on any aliquot corner within one mile thereof and all professional land surveyors known to have performed land surveys in the vicinity of the disputed corner, by written notice to the extent practicable.

On the date given in the notices pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the county surveyor shall proceed to establish the corner monument in accordance with section 38-51-103, C.R.S., and with the field notes of original surveys made by the United States by firmly planting a monument at the points found. The county surveyor shall accurately take and note courses and distances from such established monument to one or more prominent objects of a permanent nature if there are any in the vicinity and make a plat or map of the survey.

The county surveyor shall record the survey and a statement of the proceedings, including the application, notice, and names of the parties in interest, in the records of the office of the county surveyor.

Any corner monument established pursuant to this section shall be the true and legal monument defining the boundary corner as stated in the record of the survey; except that any affected party may, pursuant to article 44 of title 38, C.R.S., appeal the result within six months after the date the corner monument is established.

The reasonable fees and expenses incurred by the county surveyor in establishing a corner shall be paid by the party applying therefor.

At the time the application is filed, the county surveyor shall estimate the probable fees and expenses to be incurred in establishing the corner and shall collect that amount from the applicant.

After the corner has been established, if the estimated amount exceeds the actual fees and expenses, the excess shall be refunded. If the fees and expenses exceed the estimated amount, the applicant shall pay the difference to the county surveyor.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1508, § 42, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3)(c) amended, p. 1629, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(3)(c) amended, (HB 10-1085), ch. 95, p. 324, § 3, effective August 11.

30-10-907. County surveyor to administer oaths.

County surveyors shall have the authority to administer an oath or affirmation to deputies and assistants acting under them faithfully and impartially to discharge their duties as deputies and assistants.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1508, § 42, effective July 1.